Florida, session 2026, SB1470.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 409.9206, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 409.9206âDe-risking disease behavioral health intervention 25 services pilot program.â 26 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDING; PURPOSE.â 27 (a)âThe Legislature finds that under federal Medicaid 28 managed care regulations 42 C.F.R. s. 438.3(e)(2) and 42 C.F.R. 29 s. 438.16, the Agency for Health Care Administration may approve 30 de-risking disease behavioral health intervention services. 31 (b)âThe purpose of this section is to authorize the state 32 Medicaid plan to fund a demonstration pilot program that shall 33 provide a de-risking disease behavioral health intervention 34 services management plan to recipients of the state Medicaid 35 plan in Region G, which consists of Indian River, Martin, 36 Okeechobee, Palm Beach, and St. Lucie Counties. 37 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 38 (a)ââDe-risking disease behavioral health intervention 39 servicesâ means the following set of five concurrent self 40 management services and medical nutrition supports demonstrated 41 in scientific research to improve behavioral health and chronic 42 disease outcomes: 43 1.âBehavioral health counseling provided by a licensed 44 clinical social worker for lifestyle modifications for patients 45 diagnosed with depression and uncontrolled diabetes mellitus. 46 2.âMedical nutrition therapy provided by a registered 47 dietitian nutritionist for diet and lifestyle modifications for 48 patients diagnosed with depression and uncontrolled diabetes 49 mellitus. 50 3.âBiomarker health tracking, nudging, and reporting using 51 devices approved by the Florida Medicaid Diabetic Supply 52 Services Coverage Policy to monitor HbA1C, blood sugar glucose, 53 oxygen, heart rate, lipids, weight, body mass index, blood 54 pressure, and other biomarkers. 55 4.âMedical disease nutrition education designed for 56 depression and uncontrolled diabetes mellitus which is evidence 57 based. 58 5.âMedical nutrition supports that are evidence-based 59 lifestyle modification services for patients diagnosed with 60 depression and uncontrolled diabetes mellitus, including, but 61 not limited to, clinical nutrition groceries, home-delivered 62 medically tailored meals, produce prescriptions, or other 63 evidence-based, medically necessary nutrition interventions 64 demonstrated to be cost effective by scientific research 65 studies. 66 (b)ââParticipantâ means a Medicaid recipient and his or her 67 family participating in the pilot program. 68 (c)ââPilot programâ means the demonstration pilot program 69 established under this section. 70 (3)âPILOT PROGRAM.âContingent upon an appropriation, the 71 state Medicaid plan may fund a demonstration pilot program to 72 provide de-risking disease behavioral health intervention 73 services to eligible Medicaid recipients in Region G, which 74 consists of Indian River, Martin, Okeechobee, Palm Beach, and 75 St. Lucie Counties. 76 (a)âUnder the pilot program, Medicaid managed assistance 77 providers may offer de-risking disease behavioral health 78 intervention services: 79 1.âIn lieu of services specified in the state Medicaid plan 80 to a Medicaid recipient who is diagnosed with both: 81 a.âDepression or anxiety; and 82 b.âDiabetes mellitus, obesity, or coronary heart disease. 83 2.âAs a disease management plan to 1,000 participants in 84 Region G. 85 (b)âThe design, evaluation, and outcome measures of the 86 pilot program must be developed from a research evaluation 87 conducted by nutrition scientists at the Tufts University 88 Friedman School of Nutrition Science and Policy, a qualified and 89 accredited academic institution specializing in nutrition, and 90 program implementation experts at the Florida Health and 91 Nutrition Coalition. 92 (c)âThe pilot program shall: 93 1.âBe designed to provide de-risking disease behavioral 94 health intervention services, diabetic supply services, chronic 95 disease self-management and education services, and medical 96 nutrition supports coverage in lieu of services specified in the 97 state Medicaid plan. 98 2.âCollect data, including, but not limited to, the rate by 99 which pilot program participants, and their families, comply 100 with de-risking disease behavioral health intervention services; 101 health outcomes and biomarkers associated with the participants 102 and their families; and overall impact of the pilot program on 103 participant diagnosis, chronic health condition, and disease 104 symptoms. 105 3.âInclude measures to review and assess data, including 106 health outcomes and biomarkers, and the impact on participants 107 and their families to evaluate the overall impact of the pilot 108 program on disease management. 109 (4)âANNUAL REPORT.âThe state Medicaid plan shall: 110 (a)âAs soon as practicable after the expiration of the 111 pilot program, prepare and submit to the President of the Senate 112 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a report on the 113 number of times during the preceding year the de-risking disease 114 behavioral health intervention services were used in Indian 115 River, Martin, Okeechobee, Palm Beach, and St. Lucie Counties, a 116 summary of the data the state Medicaid plan collected, and 117 recommendations for any legislative action. 118 (b)âConsider the actual cost, measurable goals and health 119 outcomes met, and participant adherence to the de-risking 120 disease behavioral health intervention services when paying the 121 capitation rates for that managed care organization under the 122 contract. 123 (5)âEXPIRATION.â 124 (a)âThe pilot program shall expire August 31, 2030. 125 (b)âThis section expires September 1, 2031. 126 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.